District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.09

License expiration date.

(a)

(1)

The Center shall assign an expiration date for each basic business license. All renewable licenses endorsed on that basic business license shall expire on that date.

(2)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every license issued in accordance with this subchapter shall be valid for either 2 or 4 years from the date of issue, depending on which license term the applicant selects, unless earlier revoked or voluntarily relinquished, and licenses shall be issued on a staggered basis, using as the renewal date the date of incorporation if the business is incorporated, the date of organization if the business is unincorporated, or the birth date of the principal if the business is a sole proprietorship. The fee charged for a 4-year license renewal shall be twice that of a 2-year license renewal.

(3)

Valid licenses that for any reason expire on a date other than a date determined in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be extended automatically until the next anniversary of the date determined in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.

(b)

All renewable licenses endorsed on a basic business license shall be renewed by the Center under conditions originally imposed unless a regulatory agency advises the Center of conditions or denials to be imposed before the endorsement is renewed.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(k), 50 DCR 6913
Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-277, § 2(a), 60 DCR 2117

History

This section is referenced in § 47-2805.01, § 47-2851.05, and § 47-2851.15.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.9.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-38 substituted “basic” for “master” throughout the section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-277 rewrote (a)(2).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(k) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Emergency Legislation